Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 60. Excise Tax on Alcoholic Beverages.

Revisor’s notes. —

Pursuant to § 3, ch. 46, SLA 1983, the phrase “alcoholic beverage” and the word “beverage” were substituted in 1983 for the phrase “intoxicating liquor” and the word “liquor” in this chapter.

Administrative Code. —

For excise tax on alcoholic beverages, see 15 AAC 60.

Sec. 43.60.010.
Alcoholic beverage tax.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, every brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, retailer, wholesaler, or manufacturer who sells alcoholic beverages in the state or who consigns shipments of alcoholic beverages into the state, whether or not the alcoholic beverages are brewed, distilled, bottled, or manufactured in the state, shall pay on all malt beverages (alcoholic content of one percent or more by volume), wines, and hard or distilled alcoholic beverages, the following taxes:

malt beverages at the rate of $1.07 a gallon or fraction of a gallon;

cider with at least 0.5 percent alcohol by volume but not more than seven percent alcohol by volume, at the rate of $1.07 a gallon or fraction of a gallon;

wine or other beverages, other than beverages described in (1) or (2) of this subsection, of 21 percent alcohol by volume or less, at the rate of $2.50 a gallon or fraction of a gallon; and

other beverages having a content of more than 21 percent alcohol by volume at the rate of $12.80 a gallon.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 235 SLA 1976.]

A brewer shall pay a tax at the rate of 35 cents a gallon on sales of the first 60,000 barrels of beer sold in the state each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, for beer produced in the United States if the producing brewery meets the qualifications of 26 U.S.C. 5051(a)(2). To qualify for the tax rate under this subsection, the brewer must file with the department a copy of an Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau acknowledged copy of the brewer’s notice of intent to pay reduced rate of tax required under 27 C.F.R. 25.167 for the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins for which the partial exemption is sought. If proof of eligibility is not received by the department before June 1, the tax rate under this subsection does not apply until the first day of the second month after the month the notice is received by the department. For purposes of applying this subsection, a barrel of beer may contain not more than 31 gallons.

History.

(§ 35-4-31 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1961; am § 28 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 235 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1983; am §§ 2, 3 ch 116 SLA 2002; am § 21 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 60, art. 1.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The clear wording of this section leaves little room for interpretation. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

In determining whether a tax is actually levied upon the United States or its property in violation of the federal government’s constitutional immunity, the United States Supreme Court has looked to the substance rather than the form of the particular statute in order to determine whether the incident of the tax was on a federal instrumentality. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

An analysis of the substance of this section will only reveal that the liquor excise tax is not imposed on any agency or other instrumentality of the federal government. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Alaska can tax retail liquor stores and beverage dispensaries located within military reservations if they do not fall within the exemptions set forth in 4 USC 107. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may regulate the sale of intoxicating beverages on military reservations by businesses which are not instrumentalities of the federal government, may require such businesses to obtain retail store or beverage dispensary licenses, may inspect them to determine if they are operating in compliance with the liquor laws of Alaska (subject to restrictions for security reasons), and may take any action authorized by Alaska liquor statutes if they are not doing business in compliance with state liquor laws and regulations. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Members of the national guard of Alaska enjoy no different status than other civilian residents of Alaska as far as Alaska liquor laws are concerned unless they or their units shall have been called into the active service of the United States. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Intoxicating beverages may only be sold or dispensed at a national guard encampment or installation in Alaska by a licensed beverage dispensary or licensed retail liquor store. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Civilian clubs are subject to state liquor laws and regulations and are subject to state revenue laws. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 43.60.011.
Consigned beverage inventories.

The tax imposed in AS

43.60.010

may not be levied on consigned shipments of alcoholic beverages into the state if the consignments are to state licensed bonded warehouses in this state until the alcoholic beverage is removed from the warehouse for sale or consignment to retailers.

History.

(§ 4 ch 235 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 43.60.020.
Monthly statement and payments.

Each brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, manufacturer, or other consignor shall submit a report to the department on or before the last day of each calendar month. The report must contain an account of the alcoholic beverages sold or consigned to buyers or consignees in the state during the preceding month, setting out

the total number of gallons, including fractional gallons sold or consigned;

the names and Alaska address of each buyer and consignee; and

the gallonage of each kind of beverage sold or consigned to the respective buyers or consignees.

The brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, manufacturer, or other consignor shall pay monthly to the department, all taxes, computed at the rates prescribed in this chapter, on the respective total quantities of the classes of beverage sold or consigned during the preceding month. The monthly return shall be filed and the tax paid on or before the last day of each month to cover the preceding month.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 72 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 72 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 72 SLA 1971.]

History.

(§ 35-4-32 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 20 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 60, art. 1.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), in the first sentence of the introductory language, substituted “submit” for “send”, “report” for “statement by airmail, postage prepaid,” and, in the second sentence, substituted “report” for “statement”.

Sec. 43.60.030.
Delinquency. [Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976. For civil penalty, see AS 43.05.220.]

Sec. 43.60.040.
Administration and enforcement of tax.

Each brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer is primarily liable for the payment of the excise taxes on alcoholic beverages sold, and, except as provided under (h) of this section, shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond of $25,000 payable to the department and approved by the Department of Law. If a wholesaler fails to pay the tax to the state, the wholesaler forfeits the bond and the wholesaler’s license shall be revoked. The department, in its discretion, may issue permits in place of bonds to resident holders of wholesale, malt beverage, and wine licenses doing business wholly in the state who pay the tax before shipment.

Upon receipt of the bond and its subsequent approval, the department shall issue a license certificate authorizing the brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer, liable for the payment of the tax, to sell alcoholic beverages in the state or to consign shipments of alcoholic beverages to the state. Except as provided under (h) of this section, it is unlawful for a brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer to sell alcoholic beverages in the state or to consign shipments of alcoholic beverages into the state without first furnishing the required bond and obtaining the license certificate or permit from the department. The license certificate does not constitute permission to sell alcoholic beverages in the state or to consign them to the state without having complied with other requirements of state or federal law.

The retailer or buyer is secondarily liable for the taxes on alcoholic beverages that are sold to the retailer or buyer. The state has a lien upon the beverages, and may seize, confiscate, and sell them to satisfy the payment of the taxes and the costs of the proceedings, without regard to where or in whose possession the beverages are found. If the beverages are not found or not identifiable, the state may seize, confiscate, and sell an equal quantity of the same kind of beverage found in the possession of the retailer or other buyer to whom the beverages on which the taxes were not paid were sold.

[Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

A license issued under this section must include

the name and address of the licensee;

the nature or type of alcoholic beverage business to be conducted; and

the year for which the license is issued.

The department may not require a brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer who has timely filed monthly tax returns and paid monthly taxes to the department over the most recent three consecutive years to maintain a bond if the brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer continues to remain in compliance with this chapter. The department shall notify the brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer of any noncompliance that requires the brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer to file a bond under (a) of this section. The brewer, distiller, bottler, jobber, wholesaler, or manufacturer shall, within 30 days after receiving the notice of noncompliance, file with the department a bond under (a) of this section.

In this section “person” includes an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation or a member, agent, or employee of a partnership, who, as officer, agent, employee, or member, is under duty to perform the act in respect to which the violation occurs.

History.

(§ 35-4-33 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1951; § 1 ch 72 SLA 1955; am §§ 42, 46 ch 113 SLA 1980; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 10 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (g) and (h) were formerly (h) and (g), respectively. Renumbered in 1990.

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i) and relettered in 2019, with conforming changes to references in (a) and (b).

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning civil penalties, see AS

43.05.220

; for present provisions concerning criminal penalties, see AS

43.05.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 6, 2019, in the first sentence of (a), inserted “, except as provided under (h) of this section,” preceding “shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond”; at the beginning of the second sentence of (b), substituted “Except as provided under (h) of this section, it is unlawful” for “It is unlawful”; added (i) [now (h)].

Sec. 43.60.050.
Disposition of proceeds; alcohol and other drug abuse treatment and prevention fund.

The alcohol and other drug abuse treatment and prevention fund is established in the general fund. The Department of Administration shall separately account for 50 percent of the tax collected under AS

43.60.010

and deposit it into the alcohol and other drug abuse treatment and prevention fund.

The legislature may use the annual estimated balance in the fund to make appropriations to the Department of Health and Social Services to establish and maintain programs for the prevention and treatment of alcoholism, drug abuse, and misuse of hazardous volatile materials and substances by inhalant abusers under AS

47.37.030

.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 4 ch 116 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For the legislative statement of purpose relating to the alcohol and other drug abuse treatment and prevention fund established in this section, see § 4, ch. 116, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 43.60.060.
Manufacturer direct shipment tax; statement; audit.

A holder of a manufacturer direct shipment license under AS

04.09.370

who sells its product in the state or who consigns shipments of its product into the state shall

be subject to the taxes provided under AS

43.60.010(a)

;

provide monthly statements and other information required under AS

43.60.020

with the remittance of a tax collected under this section;

allow the Department of Revenue to perform an audit of the holder’s records upon request; and

consent to the jurisdiction of a state court concerning enforcement of this section relating to the collection of taxes and other money owed by the holder, including interest and penalties.

History.

(§ 160 ch 8 SLA 2022)